New Jersey, session 221, S1875.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.19:7-3  is amended to read as follows: 19:7-3.    The appointment of or application for challengers shall be filed with the county board not later than the second Tuesday preceding any election. No person shall be appointed a challenger under this Title who is not a registered voter in the county in which the district is located in which such person is appointed to serve [, and no]. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, in the case of a congressional or legislative district, a person who is a registered voter in any county or part thereof located within the congressional or legislative district may be appointed as a challenger in any election district in any county or part thereof located within the congressional or legislative district. No appointed challenger shall serve in any district other than that to which appointed except for challengers appointed by the chairman of a county committee, pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection b. of R.S.19:7-1. (cf: P.L.1999, c.232, s.28) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, a person cannot be appointed to serve as a challenger in an election district unless that person is a registered voter in the county in which the election district is located. This bill would allow a person to be appointed to serve as a challenger in any election district located within a congressional or legislative district where the person resides. Under the bill, in the case of a congressional or legislative district, a person who is a registered voter in any county or part thereof located within the congressional or legislative district may be appointed as a challenger in any election district in any county or part thereof located within the congressional or legislative district.